Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-269
Bonds; legal investments; for whom; considered securities.

The bonds issued by and under the authority of the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act by the authority are declared to be legal investments in which all public officers or public bodies of this state, its political subdivisions, all municipalities and municipal subdivisions, all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on insurance business, all banks, bankers, banking associations, trust companies, savings associations, savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, personal representatives, and other fiduciaries, and all other persons who are now or may later be authorized to invest in bonds or in other obligations of this state may invest funds, including capital, in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are also hereby made securities which may be deposited with and received by all public officers and bodies of this state, any agency or political subdivision of this state, and all municipalities and public corporations for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of this state is now or may be later authorized by law.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 69;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 66.